Utah statutes.
53B-6-105.9.   Incentive program for engineering, computer science, and
related technology faculty.
(1)  The Legislature shall provide an annual appropriation to help fund the
faculty incentive component of the Engineering and Computer Science Initiative
established under Section 53B-6-105.
(2)  The appropriation shall be used to hire, recruit, and retain outstanding
faculty in engineering, computer science, and related technology fields under
guidelines established by the State Board of Regents.
(3) (a)  State institutions of higher education shall match the appropriation
on a one-to-one basis in order to qualify for state money appropriated under
Subsection (1).
(b) (i)  Qualifying institutions shall annually report their matching dollars
to the board.
(ii)  The board shall make a summary report of the institutional matches.
(iii)  The annual report of the Technology Initiative Advisory Board required
by Section 53B-6-105.5 shall include the summary report of the institutional
matches.
(4)  The board shall make a rule in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing policies and procedures to apply
for and distribute the state appropriation to qualifying institutions.
